Atelier/dicollect/fr-dicollecte-daily-classique-reforme1990-v2012-12-27.aff
FLAG long
SFX c1 évrer èvrera/n'q' évrer is:ifut is:3sg
SFX c1 éyer èyera/n'q' éyer is:ifut is:3sg
SFX c1 er erons/n' er is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c1 ébrer èbrerons/n' ébrer is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c1 écer ècerons/n' écer is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c1 écher ècherons/n' écher is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c1 écrer ècrerons/n' écrer is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c1 éder èderons/n' éder is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c1 éger ègerons/n' éger is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c1 égler èglerons/n' égler is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c1 égner ègnerons/n' égner is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c1 égrer ègrerons/n' égrer is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c1 éguer èguerons/n' éguer is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c1 éler èlerons/n' éler is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c1 émer èmerons/n' émer is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c1 éner ènerons/n' éner is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c1 éper èperons/n' éper is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c1 équer èquerons/n' équer is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c1 érer èrerons/n' érer is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c1 éser èserons/n' éser is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c1 éter èterons/n' éter is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c1 étrer ètrerons/n' étrer is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c1 évrer èvrerons/n' évrer is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c1 éyer èyerons/n' éyer is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c1 er erez/n' er is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c1 ébrer èbrerez/n' ébrer is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c1 écer ècerez/n' écer is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c1 écher ècherez/n' écher is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c1 écrer ècrerez/n' écrer is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c1 éder èderez/n' éder is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c1 éger ègerez/n' éger is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c1 égler èglerez/n' égler is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c1 égner ègnerez/n' égner is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c1 égrer ègrerez/n' égrer is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c1 éguer èguerez/n' éguer is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c1 éler èlerez/n' éler is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c1 émer èmerez/n' émer is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c1 éner ènerez/n' éner is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c1 éper èperez/n' éper is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c1 équer èquerez/n' équer is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c1 érer èrerez/n' érer is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c1 éser èserez/n' éser is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c1 éter èterez/n' éter is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c1 étrer ètrerez/n' étrer is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c1 évrer èvrerez/n' évrer is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c1 éyer èyerez/n' éyer is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c1 er eront/n'q' er is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c1 ébrer èbreront/n'q' ébrer is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c1 écer èceront/n'q' écer is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c1 écher ècheront/n'q' écher is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c1 écrer ècreront/n'q' écrer is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c1 éder èderont/n'q' éder is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c1 éger ègeront/n'q' éger is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c1 égler ègleront/n'q' égler is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c1 égner ègneront/n'q' égner is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c1 égrer ègreront/n'q' égrer is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c1 éguer ègueront/n'q' éguer is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c1 éler èleront/n'q' éler is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c1 émer èmeront/n'q' émer is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c1 éner èneront/n'q' éner is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c1 éper èperont/n'q' éper is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c1 équer èqueront/n'q' équer is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c1 érer èreront/n'q' érer is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c1 éser èseront/n'q' éser is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c1 éter èteront/n'q' éter is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c1 étrer ètreront/n'q' étrer is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c1 évrer èvreront/n'q' évrer is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c1 éyer èyeront/n'q' éyer is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c1 er erais/n'j' er is:cond is:1sg
SFX c1 ébrer èbrerais/n'j' ébrer is:cond is:1sg
SFX c1 écer ècerais/n'j' écer is:cond is:1sg
SFX c1 écher ècherais/n'j' écher is:cond is:1sg
SFX c1 écrer ècrerais/n'j' écrer is:cond is:1sg
SFX c1 éder èderais/n'j' éder is:cond is:1sg
SFX c1 éger ègerais/n'j' éger is:cond is:1sg
SFX c1 égler èglerais/n'j' égler is:cond is:1sg
SFX c1 égner ègnerais/n'j' égner is:cond is:1sg
SFX c1 égrer ègrerais/n'j' égrer is:cond is:1sg
SFX c1 éguer èguerais/n'j' éguer is:cond is:1sg
SFX c1 éler èlerais/n'j' éler is:cond is:1sg
SFX c1 émer èmerais/n'j' émer is:cond is:1sg
SFX c1 éner ènerais/n'j' éner is:cond is:1sg
SFX c1 éper èperais/n'j' éper is:cond is:1sg
SFX c1 équer èquerais/n'j' équer is:cond is:1sg
SFX c1 érer èrerais/n'j' érer is:cond is:1sg
SFX c1 éser èserais/n'j' éser is:cond is:1sg
SFX c1 éter èterais/n'j' éter is:cond is:1sg
SFX c1 étrer ètrerais/n'j' étrer is:cond is:1sg
SFX c1 évrer èvrerais/n'j' évrer is:cond is:1sg
SFX c1 éyer èyerais/n'j' éyer is:cond is:1sg
SFX c1 er erais/n' er is:cond is:2sg
SFX c1 ébrer èbrerais/n' ébrer is:cond is:2sg
SFX c1 écer ècerais/n' écer is:cond is:2sg
SFX c1 écher ècherais/n' écher is:cond is:2sg
SFX c1 écrer ècrerais/n' écrer is:cond is:2sg
SFX c1 éder èderais/n' éder is:cond is:2sg
SFX c1 éger ègerais/n' éger is:cond is:2sg
SFX c1 égler èglerais/n' égler is:cond is:2sg
SFX c1 égner ègnerais/n' égner is:cond is:2sg
SFX c1 égrer ègrerais/n' égrer is:cond is:2sg
SFX c1 éguer èguerais/n' éguer is:cond is:2sg
SFX c1 éler èlerais/n' éler is:cond is:2sg
SFX c1 émer èmerais/n' émer is:cond is:2sg
SFX c1 éner ènerais/n' éner is:cond is:2sg
SFX c1 éper èperais/n' éper is:cond is:2sg
SFX c1 équer èquerais/n' équer is:cond is:2sg
SFX c1 érer èrerais/n' érer is:cond is:2sg
SFX c1 éser èserais/n' éser is:cond is:2sg
SFX c1 éter èterais/n' éter is:cond is:2sg
SFX c1 étrer ètrerais/n' étrer is:cond is:2sg
SFX c1 évrer èvrerais/n' évrer is:cond is:2sg
SFX c1 éyer èyerais/n' éyer is:cond is:2sg
SFX c1 er erait/n'q' er is:cond is:3sg
SFX c1 ébrer èbrerait/n'q' ébrer is:cond is:3sg
SFX c1 écer ècerait/n'q' écer is:cond is:3sg
SFX c1 écher ècherait/n'q' écher is:cond is:3sg
SFX c1 écrer ècrerait/n'q' écrer is:cond is:3sg
SFX c1 éder èderait/n'q' éder is:cond is:3sg
SFX c1 éger ègerait/n'q' éger is:cond is:3sg
SFX c1 égler èglerait/n'q' égler is:cond is:3sg
SFX c1 égner ègnerait/n'q' égner is:cond is:3sg
SFX c1 égrer ègrerait/n'q' égrer is:cond is:3sg
SFX c1 éguer èguerait/n'q' éguer is:cond is:3sg
SFX c1 éler èlerait/n'q' éler is:cond is:3sg
SFX c1 émer èmerait/n'q' émer is:cond is:3sg
SFX c1 éner ènerait/n'q' éner is:cond is:3sg
SFX c1 éper èperait/n'q' éper is:cond is:3sg
SFX c1 équer èquerait/n'q' équer is:cond is:3sg
SFX c1 érer èrerait/n'q' érer is:cond is:3sg
SFX c1 éser èserait/n'q' éser is:cond is:3sg
SFX c1 éter èterait/n'q' éter is:cond is:3sg
SFX c1 étrer ètrerait/n'q' étrer is:cond is:3sg
SFX c1 évrer èvrerait/n'q' évrer is:cond is:3sg
SFX c1 éyer èyerait/n'q' éyer is:cond is:3sg
SFX c1 er erions/n' er is:cond is:1pl
SFX c1 ébrer èbrerions/n' ébrer is:cond is:1pl
SFX c1 écer ècerions/n' écer is:cond is:1pl
SFX c1 écher ècherions/n' écher is:cond is:1pl
SFX c1 écrer ècrerions/n' écrer is:cond is:1pl
SFX c1 éder èderions/n' éder is:cond is:1pl
SFX c1 éger ègerions/n' éger is:cond is:1pl
SFX c1 égler èglerions/n' égler is:cond is:1pl
SFX c1 égner ègnerions/n' égner is:cond is:1pl
SFX c1 égrer ègrerions/n' égrer is:cond is:1pl
SFX c1 éguer èguerions/n' éguer is:cond is:1pl
SFX c1 éler èlerions/n' éler is:cond is:1pl
SFX c1 émer èmerions/n' émer is:cond is:1pl
SFX c1 éner ènerions/n' éner is:cond is:1pl
SFX c1 éper èperions/n' éper is:cond is:1pl
SFX c1 équer èquerions/n' équer is:cond is:1pl
SFX c1 érer èrerions/n' érer is:cond is:1pl
SFX c1 éser èserions/n' éser is:cond is:1pl
SFX c1 éter èterions/n' éter is:cond is:1pl
SFX c1 étrer ètrerions/n' étrer is:cond is:1pl
SFX c1 évrer èvrerions/n' évrer is:cond is:1pl
SFX c1 éyer èyerions/n' éyer is:cond is:1pl
SFX c1 er eriez/n' er is:cond is:2pl
SFX c1 ébrer èbreriez/n' ébrer is:cond is:2pl
SFX c1 écer èceriez/n' écer is:cond is:2pl
SFX c1 écher ècheriez/n' écher is:cond is:2pl
SFX c1 écrer ècreriez/n' écrer is:cond is:2pl
SFX c1 éder èderiez/n' éder is:cond is:2pl
SFX c1 éger ègeriez/n' éger is:cond is:2pl
SFX c1 égler ègleriez/n' égler is:cond is:2pl
SFX c1 égner ègneriez/n' égner is:cond is:2pl
SFX c1 égrer ègreriez/n' égrer is:cond is:2pl
SFX c1 éguer ègueriez/n' éguer is:cond is:2pl
SFX c1 éler èleriez/n' éler is:cond is:2pl
SFX c1 émer èmeriez/n' émer is:cond is:2pl
SFX c1 éner èneriez/n' éner is:cond is:2pl
SFX c1 éper èperiez/n' éper is:cond is:2pl
SFX c1 équer èqueriez/n' équer is:cond is:2pl
SFX c1 érer èreriez/n' érer is:cond is:2pl
SFX c1 éser èseriez/n' éser is:cond is:2pl
SFX c1 éter èteriez/n' éter is:cond is:2pl
SFX c1 étrer ètreriez/n' étrer is:cond is:2pl
SFX c1 évrer èvreriez/n' évrer is:cond is:2pl
SFX c1 éyer èyeriez/n' éyer is:cond is:2pl
