Atelier/dicollect/fr-dicollecte-daily-classique-reforme1990-v2012-12-27.dic
afférer/c1p.() po:v1i
anhéler/c1p.() po:v1i
empiéter/c1p.() po:v1i
intercéder/c1p.() po:v1i
interférer/c1p.() po:v1i
